Louisiana, session 2026, HB534.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:402(F) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§402. Dates of primary and general elections; prohibited election days
* * *
F. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, every Every
bond, or tax, or other election at which a proposition or question is to be submitted
to the voters shall be held only on an a primary election date established in
Subsections B, C, and D of this Section in accordance with Article VI, Section 22 of
the Constitution of Louisiana. Every other election at which a proposition or
question is to be submitted to the voters shall be held only on an election date
established in Subsection B, C, or D of this Section. However, the sixth Saturday
after the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of any congressional
election year shall not be applicable in a parish containing a municipality with a
population of three hundred thousand or more for an election relative to a parcel fee
imposed within a security or neighborhood improvement district. For purposes of
this Subsection, "security or neighborhood improvement district" means a special
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-951 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 534
district, one of the primary purposes of which is aiding in crime prevention and
adding to the security of district residents by providing for an increased presence of
law enforcement personnel in the district or otherwise promoting and encouraging
security in the district.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the proposed
amendment of Article VI, Section 22 of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act
which originated as House Bill No. 446 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.